Washington statutes.
RCW 43.56.010

Appointment of qualified persons.

(1) The governor shall appoint three qualified persons to serve on the Washington state uniform law commission for the promotion of uniformity of legislation in the United States. A qualified person is a resident of the state of Washington and a member of the state bar association of this or another state, who is or has been a judge, law professor, legislator, or practicing attorney.

(2) In addition to the members of the commission appointed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the governor may appoint to the commission any person who has served at least twenty years on the commission and who is a life member in the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws or its successor.

(3) In addition to the members of the commission appointed pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the code reviser shall serve as a member of the commission.

[ 2009 c 218 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.56.010. Prior: 1905 c 59 s 1; RRS s 8204.]